Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-303.01
Nonemergency medical transportation for medicaid clients; contracts authorized.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services, a medicaid-managed care organization under contract with the department, or another agent working on the department's behalf may contract for nonemergency medical transportation for medicaid clients with a motor carrier or regulated motor carrier holding:

(a) A designation of authority issued pursuant to subsection (3) of section 75-311 to provide medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services; or

(b) A license that was issued pursuant to section 75-311 to engage in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services.

(2) While operating under such designation of authority or such license, a motor carrier or regulated motor carrier shall comply with:

(a) The requirements of the Department of Health and Human Services to protect the safety and well-being of department clients, including training, driver standards, background checks, and the provision and quality of service; and

(b) The rules and regulations adopted, promulgated, and enforced by the commission governing insurance requirements, equipment standards, and background checks.

Laws 1993, LB 412, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 791;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 68;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 697;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 82;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 90.
July 18, 2026